Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 20

Department of Safety

4-3-2001. Creation.

There is created and established the department of safety.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 255.1, 255.15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-319; modified.

Compiler's Notes. The department of safety, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

Acts 2014, ch. 773, § 3 provided that the division of state audit shall return to the department of safety in 2016 for the purpose of conducting a limited audit to review actions taken by the department to address the issues raised in the findings of the October 2013 performance audit report. The division of state audit shall complete the limited audit within a period sufficient to allow for its review by the government operations joint subcommittee on judiciary and government no later than December 1, 2016.

Cross-References. Accidents, reports to and duties of department regarding, title 55, ch. 10, part 1.

Anti-theft law, motor vehicles, powers and duties of department, title 55, ch. 5, part 1.

Creation of the department of safety, §4-3-101.

Drivers' licenses, law administered by department, title 55, ch. 50, part 2.

Financial Responsibility Law, administration by department, §55-12-103.

Rules and regulations as to highway use prescribed by department, §55-7-101.

4-3-2002. Commissioner.

The head of this department shall be the commissioner of safety, who shall be appointed by the governor and hold office at the governor's pleasure.

The commissioner shall be qualified as a disciplinarian and experienced in matters pertaining to safety.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 15; 1939, ch. 11, § 10; 1945, ch. 28, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 255.1, 255.15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-319.

Cross-References. Financial Responsibility Law, administration, §55-12-103.

Peace officer standards and training commission, member, §38-8-102.

Rules and regulations governing weighing of freight motor vehicles, promulgation by commissioner, §55-7-205.

4-3-2003. Highway patrol duties.

The department of safety shall assume and exercise the powers and duties of the Tennessee highway patrol under chapter 7 of this title.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 44; 1939, ch. 11, § 27; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 255.45 (Williams, § 255.46); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-320; modified.

4-3-2004. Notary powers of department employees.

The commissioner of safety is authorized to designate in writing employees of the department of safety, who shall be authorized to take acknowledgements and administer oaths and perform other notarial acts with respect to applications, reports and any and all other documents required by law or departmental regulation to be filed with the department.

Any employee so designated is authorized to perform the services and functions of a notary public with respect to such matters exclusively under the supervision and administration of the department, but no further nor otherwise.

A written list of the employees so designated shall be posted in the office of the commissioner and shall be open to inspection at all business hours.

Any false statement made on oath or affirmation before any such person shall subject the offender to punishment for perjury under the penalties now provided by law.

Acts 1939, ch. 11, § 10; 1945, ch. 28, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.15; Acts 1961, ch. 3, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-319.

Cross-References. Perjury, title 39, ch. 16, part 7.

4-3-2005. Hearing officers — Review of initial orders.

The commissioner of safety, in the commissioner's discretion, is hereby authorized to appoint or designate hearing officers to conduct contested case hearings under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

The commissioner shall delegate the commissioner's authority to review initial orders in contested cases suspending or revoking driver licenses to the administrative procedures division of the office of the secretary of state for review by an administrative judge with such division. The commissioner may delegate the commissioner's authority to review initial orders under this subsection (b) to one (1) or more additional persons. Review of initial orders shall be subject to further review and final disposition by the commissioner.

The time taken to review an initial order shall not extend the time provided in § 4-5-315 for rendering and entering a final order or order remanding the case for further proceedings by the commissioner.

Acts 1979, ch. 371, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-319; Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 65.

4-3-2006. Division of protective services.

There is created within the department of safety a division of protective services.

This division shall exercise the powers and duties formerly imposed upon the department of general services to provide police services by sworn officers for the State Capitol, the Legislative Plaza, the War Memorial Building and all state office buildings, and to provide personal security from time to time of state officials as directed by the commissioner, along with the primary, but not exclusive, responsibility of enforcing the parking regulations and policies as established by the department of general services.

This division shall oversee the state facility protection officer program in conjunction with the commissioner or the commissioner's designee pursuant to § 4-3-2019(c)(1).

The commissioner of safety shall be authorized to issue special police commissions to qualified state security personnel, who are full-time salaried employees of the state, to go armed or carry pistols while on active duty engaged in carrying out their responsibilities under subsection (a).

Such commissions shall only be issued to those personnel who have satisfactorily completed appropriate training and are certified as qualified, including physical and mental competency, to carry firearms by the Jerry F. Agee Tennessee law enforcement training academy or other similar agency; provided, that security personnel employed before July 1, 1980, shall not be required to meet the training or mental and physical requirements set out in this subdivision (b)(2) as a condition of tenure or continued employment, nor shall their failure to fulfill such requirements make them ineligible for any promotional examination for which they are otherwise eligible.

Nothing contained herein shall be construed to impose upon such security personnel the same criteria for employment and retention in state service as are required of members of the Tennessee highway patrol.

Impl. am. 1979, ch. 93, § 1; Acts 1980, ch. 884, § 1; 2017, ch. 153, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Highway patrol, title 4, ch. 7.

4-3-2007. Rules and regulations regarding motor vehicles.

Subject to the approval of the department of general services under the authority of §4-3-1105(9), the department of safety shall develop rules and regulations for the acquisition, assignment, use and disposal of motor vehicles. Such rules and regulations should promote the efficient and effective use of motor vehicles in law enforcement activities. These rules and regulations are also subject to approval by the department of finance and administration.

Acts 1981, ch. 501, §§ 4, 5.

4-3-2008. Subpoena to institutions of higher education — Information related to nonimmigrant students in possession of F-1 or M-1 student visa.

The commissioner of safety is authorized to issue a subpoena for valid law enforcement purposes to an institution of higher education in this state to compel the production of the following information with regard to nonimmigrant students possessing either an F-1 or M-1 student visa for instruction at the institution:

The number of nonimmigrant students enrolled at the institution at the beginning of a period of study;

The number of nonimmigrant students enrolled at the institution at the end of a period of study; and

The name and address of the nonimmigrant students who were enrolled at the beginning of the period of study but were not enrolled at the end of the period of study.

The commissioner has the discretion to include, in a subpoena issued under this section, a directive that the existence or contents of the subpoena or the information furnished in response to the subpoena is not to be disclosed by the institution to the students whose names and addresses are released to the commissioner.

As used in this section:

“Institution” means a college, university, seminary, vocational or technical school, or any other entity that offers a postsecondary course of study. “Institution” does not include elementary, middle, or secondary schools; and

“Period of study” means a quarter, semester, or the duration of a program that is not otherwise divided.

Acts 2016, ch. 812, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-2008 (Acts 1985, ch. 476, §§ 1, 2), concerning compensation of the commissioned members of the division of motor vehicle enforcement, was rendered ineffective by Acts 1986, ch. 935, § 8. For present law, see ch. 7, part 2 of this title.

4-3-2009. Rules and regulations regarding administration.

The commissioner of safety has the authority to establish and to promulgate such rules and regulations governing the administration and operation of the department as may be deemed necessary by the commissioner and that are not inconsistent with the laws of this state.

Acts 1988, ch. 511, § 1.

4-3-2010. Division of motor vehicle enforcement — Duties — Odometer fraud.

The division of motor vehicle enforcement, or such other division of the department as may be directed to by the commissioner, has the following responsibilities and duties:

Perform odometer fraud investigations, detect altered titles and vehicles, identify perpetrators, secure vehicle documentation and evidence for eventual indictment and prosecution of persons involved in odometer fraud;

Perform covert odometer fraud investigations of individuals and dealers in odometer tampering by use of surveillance, undercover odometer rollbacks, title washing buys and other techniques;

Perform overt odometer fraud investigations of individuals and dealers by interpreting title histories, interviewing subjects, informants, spinners and suspected perpetrators and utilizing lab analysis reports to support altered documents;

Prepare odometer fraud outline memoranda to be used by United States attorneys in the indictment and prosecution of odometer tamperers;

Assist United States attorneys in the indictment and trial process of major odometer fraud cases, and analyze and evaluate the total factual investigation for maximum effectiveness in the trial presentation by the United States attorneys;

Testify before grand juries and in criminal prosecutions;

Serve subpoenas in the investigation and prosecution of odometer fraud;

Assist and coordinate with state and federal agencies nationwide in the investigation and prosecution of odometer fraud;

Train and supervise persons involved in investigations by the unit; and

Perform other duties relative to odometer fraud as may be assigned to the unit by the division.

The division shall maintain agents in each grand division to investigate odometer fraud, but the activities of such agents shall be coordinated so as to ensure the most effective use of all employees.

The increased costs imposed on the department by this section and of Acts 1989, chapter 276 amending §§ 55-2-112 and 55-6-101 shall be funded from the increase in the state fee for certificates of title authorized by chapter 276 of the Public Acts of 1989, increasing the fee from three dollars ($3.00) to three dollars and fifty cents ($3.50).

Acts 1989, ch. 276, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 19.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

4-3-2011. Organ and tissue donor registry.

The organ procurement organization, as defined in § 68-30-102, serving Tennessee may create and maintain an electronic registry of Tennesseans who have given consent to be organ and tissue donors. On a weekly basis, the department of safety shall transmit to the electronic registry the following information on those individuals who have given consent to be organ and tissue donors:

True full name;

Residence or mailing address;

Date of birth; and

Tennessee driver license number.

The information obtained by the organ procurement organization for the purposes of subdivision (a)(1)(A) shall be used for these purposes only and shall not be disseminated further by the organ procurement organization.

The department shall offer each applicant for issuance or renewal of a driver license the opportunity for the applicant to give consent to be an organ and tissue donor. Each applicant shall be offered the opportunity to give consent by responding affirmatively to the following statement: “Yes, I want to be an organ and tissue donor.”

The department shall advise each applicant by making available the brochure referred to in subdivision (a)(4) or otherwise, that the applicant is under no compulsion to consent to be an organ and tissue donor. An individual who responds affirmatively to the consent statement gives full legal consent to donate the organs or tissue of the individual upon death. An individual may give or withdraw consent by any means provided by law, including, but not limited to, notifying the registry in writing or by electronic access to the registry.

A brochure shall be made available to each applicant explaining the execution of a document of gift for organ and tissue donation, including the consent statement referred to in subdivision (a)(2). The brochure may be made available by electronic means. The brochure shall be provided to the department free of charge by the organ procurement organization.

The department shall engage in public information and other activities to encourage all Tennesseans to become organ and tissue donors and to be so identified within the organ and tissue donor registry. Furthermore, in order to encourage and promote the highest level of organ and tissue donorship within the state, the commissioner shall periodically coordinate and convene strategy and planning meetings for representatives of the departments of commerce and insurance, education, and health, Tennessee organ and tissue donor service agencies, Tennessee hospitals, Tennessee physicians' organizations, as well as other organizations and entities that seek to promote and encourage organ and tissue donorship within the state.

Acts 1990, ch. 775, § 1; 2006, ch. 767, § 1; 2007, ch. 428, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 767, § 2 provided that subdivision (a)(2) shall become effective at such time as the department of safety finds it necessary to reprint driver license application forms. Per the code commission, the contingency has been met and subdivision (a)(2) is in effect.

Cross-References. Recipients of dead bodies, notification of communicable disease or AIDS, §68-5-102.

Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, title 68, ch. 30.

4-3-2012. Rules and regulations regarding motor carriers.

The department of safety has the power to exercise all duties, responsibilities and powers granted the department in title 65, chapter 15, to establish and promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the administration and enforcement of title 65, chapter 15.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 67.

4-3-2013. Required driving under the influence information to be posted on website of department.

The department of safety shall develop and maintain, upon its web page on the world wide web of the internet, information concerning driving under the influence of an intoxicant, including, but not limited to, the penalties for violations of the state's drunk driving laws, the blood alcohol concentration (BAC) limit, the penalties for refusing to take a breath test, the fees to have a driver license reinstated after an alcohol-related offense, the penalties for unlawful possession of alcohol by minors and statistical information concerning drunk driving. The department is authorized to include additional information on the web page as deemed necessary by the department to combat drunk driving in Tennessee.

Acts 2001, ch. 237, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Information on driving under the influence is posted on the department of safety's web site at the following location: http://www.tn.gov/safety/duioutline.shtml.

4-3-2014. [Reserved.]

The commissioner of safety may negotiate the terms of a memorandum of understanding between the state of Tennessee and the United States department of homeland security concerning the enforcement of federal immigration laws, detention and removals, and investigations in the state.

The memorandum of understanding shall be signed on behalf of the state by the commissioner of safety and the governor or as otherwise required by the appropriate federal agency.

The commissioner of safety shall designate that appropriate employees of the Tennessee highway patrol be trained pursuant to the memorandum of understanding. There shall be at least one (1) employee of the Tennessee highway patrol in each district office of the highway patrol who is trained pursuant to the memorandum of understanding.

Funding for training shall be provided pursuant to the Homeland Security Appropriation Act of 2006, Public Law 109-90, or subsequent federal funding sources.

Acts 2007, ch. 165, § 1.

4-3-2016. Connecting cell phone callers to the nearest highway patrol dispatcher through *THP (*847) program.

The department of safety is encouraged to increase its consumer information efforts about the *THP (*847) program, which connects cell phone callers to the nearest highway patrol dispatcher. The information efforts should seek to educate the motoring public about dialing “*THP (*847)” to report drivers who are violating the rules of the road to the highway patrol.

Acts 2008, ch. 1198, § 1.

4-3-2017. Authority to enter into agreements with nonprofit organizations to promote and support goals and objectives of agency.

The department of safety is authorized to enter into agreements with nonprofit organizations for the purpose of promoting and supporting the goals and objectives of the agency, including, but not limited to, law enforcement, safety education, motorist services, disaster preparedness and prevention, and marketing opportunities. No contractual agreement shall be entered into with any nonprofit entity that is tax exempt under United States Internal Revenue Code § 501(c)(3) (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), as a religious organization, an organization that is affiliated with a religious organization as defined in 26 CFR 1.6033-2(h), a nonprofit entity that is tax exempt under United States Internal Revenue Code § 527 (26 U.S.C. § 527), as a political organization, or an organization that is affiliated with a political organization, as “affiliated” is defined in 11 CFR, chapter 1.

This section shall not be interpreted to abridge any powers or duties delegated to the agency in this part.

The nonprofit shall have its board of directors elected by a process approved by the governor or the governor's designee.

The nonprofit shall be properly incorporated under the laws of this state, and approved by the internal revenue service as an organization that is exempt from federal income tax under § 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(a)), by virtue of being organizations described in § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

The nonprofit shall annually submit to the governor, the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives, within ninety (90) days after the end of its fiscal year, a complete and detailed report setting forth its operation and accomplishments.

The annual reports and all books of accounts and financial records of all funds received by grant, contract or otherwise from state, local or federal sources shall be subject to audit annually by the comptroller of the treasury. With prior approval of the comptroller of the treasury, the audit may be performed by a licensed independent public accountant selected by the nonprofit partner. If an independent public accountant is employed, the audit contract between the nonprofit partner and the independent accountant shall be on contract forms prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury. The cost of any audit shall be paid by the nonprofit partner. The comptroller of the treasury shall ensure that audits are prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and determine if the audits meet minimum audit standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury. No audit may be accepted as meeting the requirements of this section until approved by the comptroller of the treasury.

All full board meetings of a nonprofit organization concerning activities authorized by this section shall be open to the public, except for executive sessions that include, but are not limited to, any of the following matters: litigation; audits or investigations; human resources issues; gift acceptance deliberations; board training; governance; donor strategy sessions; and security measures.

All contributions to and expenditures of a nonprofit organization relating to activities authorized by this section shall be open for public inspection upon specific request to the nonprofit organization.

The proposed charter and any proposed amendments of a nonprofit organization shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury for review and comment prior to the adoption of any such charter or amendments.

Acts 2012, ch. 813, § 1.

Cross-References. Open meetings law, title 8, ch. 44.

Attorney General Opinions. Exclusion of religious or political nonprofit organizations from certain state contracts. OAG 12-29, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (3/2/2012).

4-3-2018. Authority of department regarding statewide P25 interoperable communications system.

The department has the authority to promulgate rules and regulations regarding access to its statewide P25 interoperable communications system, including the authority to collect, by rules or regulations, assessments for the use and/or maintenance of the system.

Any assessments collected by the department pursuant to the rules and regulations established in subsection (a) shall be expendable receipts of the department for use in maintaining the statewide P25 interoperable communications system.

Acts 2013, ch. 184, § 1.

4-3-2019. State facility protection officers.

The commissioner of safety may appoint and commission peace officers as provided in this section. Such peace officers shall be known as state facility protection officers. Any company licensed under title 62, chapter 35 as a private protective service and which has a contract with the state to provide armed guards may apply to the commissioner of safety for the appointment and commissioning of such number of its employees as the company shall designate to act as state facility protection officers.

The commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, upon receipt of a state facility protection officer application, shall review the application to verify the person seeking the commission is qualified to receive such commission, and may issue such commission if all requirements are met.

No person shall be commissioned unless:

The person holds an armed guard certification issued under title 62, chapter 35;

The person has received initial civilian or military training substantially similar to that of the peace officers standards and training commission in the areas pertaining to their duties;

The person substantially meets the pre-employment standards as set forth by the peace officers standards and training commission; and

The person has completed a department approved training course pertaining to their duties as a state facility protection officer.

All commissioned persons are required to maintain their armed guard certification and comply with any required, recurrent training as may be mandated by the department.

The commission issued under this subsection (b) shall only be issued to persons who are assigned to property or buildings owned or leased by the state.

The state facility protection officer program shall be overseen and directed by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee.

Each state facility protection officer assigned in accordance with subdivision (b)(4) shall have and exercise the following authority for the sole purpose of carrying out the scope of assigned duties as specified or limited within the exclusive judgment of the department of safety:

The authority to make arrests for public offenses committed against state officials or employees or committed upon, about, or against property owned or leased by the state or on public roads or rights-of-way passing through such owned or leased property;

The authority to provide security at property owned or leased by the state; and

The authority to carry weapons for the reasonable purposes of the officer's employment and only while in the performance of the officer's assigned duties.

Every state facility protection officer appointed pursuant to this section, when on duty shall possess a badge or identification card issued by the department identifying the officer as a state facility protection officer, and the officer shall exhibit the badge or identification card on demand and before making an arrest.

When a person appointed and commissioned as a state facility protection officer leaves employment with the company that person's powers as a state facility protection officer shall cease and terminate at that time. The company shall notify the commissioner in writing within one (1) business day of the person leaving employment, and shall return any badge or identification to the department within five (5) business days of the day the person leaves employment.

When the department no longer requires the services of a person appointed and commissioned as a state facility protection officer, the department of safety shall notify the company. Upon notification, the powers of the state facility protection officer shall cease and terminate. The company shall not return the person to an assignment under the contract and shall return any badge or identification held by the person to the department.

Acts 2014, ch. 855, § 1; 2017, ch. 153, § 3.